Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.900

Construction—Domestic relations terms—2009 c 521.

For the purposes of this chapter, the terms spouse, marriage, marital, husband, wife, widow, widower, next of kin, and family shall be interpreted as applying equally to state registered domestic partnerships or individuals in state registered domestic partnerships as well as to marital relationships and married persons, and references to dissolution of marriage shall apply equally to state registered domestic partnerships that have been terminated, dissolved, or invalidated, to the extent that such interpretation does not conflict with federal law. Where necessary to implement chapter 521, Laws of 2009, gender-specific terms such as husband and wife used in any statute, rule, or other law shall be construed to be gender neutral, and applicable to individuals in state registered domestic partnerships.

[ 2009 c 521 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2009 c 521 ss 5-8, 79, 87-103, 107, 151, 165, 166, 173-175, and 190-192: "(1) Sections 5 through 8, 79, 87 through 103, 107, 151, 173 through 175, and 190 through 192 of this act take effect January 1, 2014.

(2) Sections 165 and 166 of this act take effect August 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 521 s 201.]